Illinois, session 104th, HB4346.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The University of Illinois Hospital Act is 5amended by adding Section 8k as follows: 6    (110 ILCS 330/8k new)7    Sec. 8k. Autologous and direct blood donation. The 8University of Illinois Hospital shall cause each of the 9facilities under its jurisdiction that provide inpatient care 10to comply with Section 6.21a of the Hospital Licensing Act. 11    Section 10. The Illinois Clinical Laboratory and Blood 12Bank Act is amended by adding Section 7-116 as follows: 13    (210 ILCS 25/7-116 new)14    Sec. 7-116. Autologous or direct blood donation.15    (a) A blood bank that facilitates autologous or direct 16blood donations shall comply with a physician's order 17prescribing for an individual an autologous or direct blood 18donation.19    (b) A blood bank may charge a fee in an amount reasonable 20and necessary to cover the blood bank's administrative cost of 21facilitating an autologous or direct blood donation that a   HB4346- 2 -LRB104 17030 BAB 30445 b1physician orders under subsection (a).  2    Section 15. The Hospital Licensing Act is amended by 3adding Section 6.21a as follows: 4    (210 ILCS 85/6.21a new)5    Sec. 6.21a. Autologous and direct blood donation. A 6hospital that facilitates blood donations shall allow an 7individual on whom a medical procedure is to be performed to 8provide an autologous or direct blood donation that a 9physician orders for the procedure.